Utah statutes.
70C-7-203.   Refunds and penalties as setoff to obligation.

Refunds or penalties to which the debtor is entitled under this part may be set off against the debtor's obligation and may be raised as a defense to a suit on the obligation without regard to the time limitations prescribed by this part.

